Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-702 Savings clause. A document
of title issued or a bailment that arises before July 2, 2004 and the rights,
obligations, and interests flowing from that document or bailment are governed
by any statute or other rule amended or repealed by the act that enacted this
article as if amendment or repeal had not occurred and may be terminated,
completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute or other rule. [L 2004,
c 163, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 2, 2004" substituted for "the effective
date of this article".

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next